Illinois, session 104th, SB940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois School Student Records Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 50-1)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Illinois School Student Records Act.9(Source: P.A. 79-1108.)